North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 25. Regulation of Precious Metal Businesses. [Repealed]

§§ 66-163 through 66-173.

Recodified as Part 2 of Article 45 of Chapter 66,

G.S. 66-405

through 66-414, by Session Laws 2012-46, s. 15, effective October 1, 2012, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.

§§ 66-174 through 66-179.

Reserved for future codification purposes.